 We now have 4-month-old mice that are not diabetic when they were previously diabetic.
 Dr Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and president of the Canadian diabetes Association,
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, noting that these results are not applicable to people who are already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, during a radio broadcast on Sveriges Radio, in Sweden, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy,
 Danius said, I have called and sent Emails to his closest collaborator and I have received very friendly responses.
 Auparavant, the Ceo of Ring, Jamie Siminoff, has remarked that he launched the company when the Bell of his front door was not audible from his garage.
 He says he invented a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 M . Siminoff has stated that sales increased after his appearance in 2013 on an episode of Shark Tank,
 By the end of 2017, Siminoff had appeared on the home shopping channel Qvc.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with an ADT competitor, the ADT Corporation.
 Even though an experimental vaccine seems so far to be able to reduce the death rate of Ebola,
 Even though the administration of a cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, had at first shown promising signs on the ground, formal studies have shown that its ability to limit deaths did not live up to expectations.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, which means that scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The American gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts the absolute need for the Olympic family to promote a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We are in agreement with the statement of the USOC that the interests of our athletes, our clubs and their sport would be better served by moving forward and making significant changes within our organization rather than by revoking accreditation.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how the abuse of the survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone unnoticed for so long and adopts any and all changes necessary and appropriate.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal,
 Throughout the nineteen sixty s, Brzezinski worked for John F . Kennedy as a counselor, and then for the administration of Lyndon B . Johnson.
 During the 1976 primaries, he advised Carter on foreign policy, and then was a national security advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 During his time at the NSA, he helped Carter to resolve diplomatically international issues such as the Camp David accords in the late seventy s, the normalization of relations between the United States and China at the end of the seventy s, the Iranian revolution and its consequences such as the taking of hostages in Iran in the late seventy s, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in the late seventy s.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma stone, received nominations in all the major categories.
 Gosling and stone were both nominated for best actor and best actress.
 Among the other nominations are best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costumes, best editing, best original music, best production design, best sound mixing, best sound editing, best original screenplay, and best original score.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song.
 Late Sunday, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, in a statement made through the Secretary of state,
 The announcement came after Trump had a phone call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also take care of the captured ISIS fighters that, according to the statement, European nations have refused to repatriate.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's already very widespread, but it provides details that fossils generally cannot,
 The scientists say that the animal's plumage was Brownish-Red on the top and pale or Carotenoid on the bottom.
 This discovery also helps us to better understand the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Given that dinosaur feathers did not have a fully developed rachis,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used in flight but rather for regulation or display of temperature, and the researchers have suggested that even though it is the tail of a young dinosaur,
 The scientists point out that this is the tail of a juvenile dinosaur, but the specimen reveals a plumage belonging to an adult, not a young one.
 A car bomb exploded at the police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, this morning, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty others.
 The governor's office said that nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 The police have said they suspect a Daesh militant as the suspect behind this attack.
 They found that the sun worked on the same basic principles as all the other stars,
 Luminosity and rotation are used in conjunction to determine the number of Rossby, which is linked to the flow of plasma.
 As for the magnetic inversions, the smaller the number of Rossby, the less the star is active.
 Iwasaki had problems during his voyage,
 It has been stolen by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal, and been arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 This will allow for backwards compatibility with 802.11a, b and g, provided the station has two radios.
 The speeds of the 802.11n standard are significantly faster than those of its predecessors, with a theoretical maximum of 600 Mbit per second.
 Duvall, who is married and has two adult children, did not make a good impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 When asked to comment, Miller stated,
 We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP significantly by 2020 from the 2005 level,
 He has not quantified these reductions, saying they will be based on Chinese economic output.
 Hu has encouraged developing countries to avoid the old method of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added, however, that we should not ask them to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development, their responsibility, and their capabilities.
 The Iraq study group presented its report today at 12 a M . Eastern time.
 He warned that no action in Iraq at this stage will end sectarian war, the growing violence or the slide towards chaos.
 The report opens with a call for an open debate and a consensus in the United States on the policy towards the Middle East.
 The report is very critical of almost all aspects of the current government's policy towards Iraq and strongly argues for a change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of the year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile interventions and to restore diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current Argentine Senator and First Lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for President last night in La Plata, a city located 50 kilometers,
 Ms Kirchner announced her intention to run for President at the Teatro Argentino, the same place where she had begun her 2005 campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The debate was triggered by the controversy over the spending and reconstruction in the wake of Hurricane Katrina,
 The critics of the reconstruction effort focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to people perceived as insiders of Washington.
 More than four million people attended the funeral.
 Because of the large number of people present, it was not possible for everyone to attend the funeral at St . Peter's.
 Several large television screens were set up in different places in Rome to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland, similar installations have been realized and have been seen by a large number of people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policies for concentrating resources on easy-to-solve cases,
 The Congress launched funding for the anti-pornography initiative in the course of the fiscal year two thousand and five, while noting that the FBI was about to assign ten agents to the fight against adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the innings, 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 four and 2 six runs.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, got good results and scored a century together.
 But after losing the captain's helm, India has only won 36 races and lost seven helms until the end of the race.
 The President of the United States, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore in the morning of November sixteen,
 He was welcomed by Wong Kan Seng, the deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and discussed trade and terrorism with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore.
 After seven days of Midterm election defeats, Bush announced his plan to expand trade in Asia.
 The Prime Minister, Stephen Harper, has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a multi-party committee for review, before its second reading, after a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with the NDP leader, Jack Layton, at the PMO.
 Layton had asked for changes to the Conservatives' environmental bill at a meeting with the prime minister, asking for a full and thorough reformulation of the Conservatives' environmental bill.
 And since then, the Federal Government has taken the lead in funding the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, and the state government and some of the state politicians have called it a farce in the lead up to the November elections.
 But the Prime Minister, John Howard, has said that this law is only intended to prevent the hospital from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government,
 According to the latest bulletin, tide gauges indicate that a tsunami has occurred,
 No damage or injury was reported in Tonga, but electricity was temporarily cut off, which would have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning issued by the Pacific Tsunami Warning Centre.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii located on or near the coasts were closed all day Wednesday despite the lifted alerts.
 The American President, George W . Bush, welcomed the news.
 The spokesman for Bush, Gordon Johndroe, called the North Korean promise a major step towards the goal of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 The Subtropical storm Jerry, the tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season,
 At this point, the National Hurricane Center says that Jerry is not a threat to land.
 According to the U S . Army Corps of engineers, a rainfall of six inches could open a breach in the previously damaged levees.
 The ninth district, which experienced flooding of up to 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina,
 The water is pouring over the dike in a section of about one hundred feet wide.
 In his speech at Wikinews last month, Commons director Adam Cuerden expressed his frustration at the deletions that had been made.
 He lied to us from the start, first by using legal reasons,
 The community's dissatisfaction has led to the current efforts to design a policy regarding the site's millions of freely accessible media.
 The work that was done was primarily theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the observations that were being made of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect that the team were looking for would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 Just as the moon exerts a pull on the earth, causing tides, the Milky way exercises a pull on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The scientists were able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way that it affects normal matter.
 According to this theory, the majority of dark matter around a Galaxy is in a sort of halo, and is made up of a large number of small particles.
 The television reports show white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities are warning residents to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive cobalt and iodine have been identified at the plant.
 The authorities assume that this means that the uranium fuel reservoirs on the site have cracks and leaks.
 Dr Tony Moll discovered Multi-Drug-Resistant tuberculosis in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 In an interview, he stated that the new Mutation was, quote, very troubling and alarming because of the high death rate.
 Some patients would have contracted the virus at the hospital, according to Dr . Moll, and at least two of them were part of the hospital staff.
 Over a one year period, a person infected can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the percentage of TB-UR in the total group of people with TB still seems low,
 The two satellites, which weighed both more than 450 kg and were moving at about 28,000 km per hour,
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 We're still trying to determine the extent of the damage and how the earth will be affected.
 The strategic command of the United States Department of Defense follows the debris.
 The results of the tracing will be published on a public Website.
 A doctor at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, has been charged with murder after his mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, according to Ohio officials.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground at blue ash, in Cincinnati,
 She directed the officers to her Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered in blood-stained blankets.
 The police have stated that the body has been there for about a day.
 The first cases of this seasonal illness were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans by mosquitoes.
 The outbreak has led the Indian government to take measures such as the deployment of pig collectors in the worst affected areas, the distribution of thousands of mosquito nets and the spraying of pesticides.
 Several million vaccines against encephalitis have also been promised by the government, which will help to prepare the agencies for next year.
 The plans for the delivery of vaccines in the historically hardest-hit areas this year have been delayed due to a lack of funds and a low priority given to these diseases compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where three years later, he began working for the Swedish post office as its chief engraver.
 He has produced over 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is of such quality and at such a high level of detail that he is one of the few well-known philatelists who is known to the general public.
 His one thousandth stamp was the magnificent,
 He has also engraved banknotes for many countries, including the portraits of the Prime Minister on the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 Following the accident, Gibson was transported to the hospital, but died immediately after.
 The driver of the truck, a 64 year old man, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at around 1200 GMT the same day.
 An employee of a garage near the scene of the accident said,
 They all came running from the place where the accident had occurred.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali include the safeguarding of the world's last forests and sharing of technologies to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN hopes to finalize a fund to help countries hit by global warming to cope with the impacts.
 The money could be used to build houses that are better able to withstand flooding, to better manage water and to diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some to prevent women from talking about their health have failed.
 She came to this conclusion thanks to the multiple positive comments and encouragement she received from both women and men on the importance of considering contraception as a necessity.
 Once the fight was over, and the injured had been taken to the infirmary, about 40 of the remaining inmates stayed in the courtyard, refusing to return to their cells.
 The negotiators have tried to rectify the situation, but the prisoners' demands are not clear.
 Between 2200 and 2300 MDT, the inmates set a fire in the courtyard.
 Soon, officers equipped with riot gear entered the courtyard and coerced the detainees with tear gas.
 The firefighters eventually put out the fire at 11:35 p M.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal flooding that used to spread sediments into the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the creation of sandbanks and beaches, which served as habitats for the fauna.
 As a result, two species of fish have become extinct and two others are in danger of becoming extinct, including the sturgeon with a bony head.
 Although the water level will only rise a few meters after the flood, the authorities hope that this will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks downstream.
 No tsunami alert was issued and, according to the Jakarta geophysics agency, no tsunami alert will be issued because the earthquake did not reach the magnitude of 6.5.
 Despite the lack of a tsunami risk, residents panicked and left their homes and businesses.
 Despite the tears shed during her farewell, Oprah Winfrey clearly told her fans that she would be back.
 And it's not a goodbye, it's a page turning and a new page opening.
 The final results of the Namibian Presidential and Parliamentary elections indicate that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba,
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation, SWAPO,
 The coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the site, and a plane from another coalition was sent to assist.
 The accident occurred in mountainous terrain, and it seems that it was caused by a malicious fire.
 The efforts to find the site of the accident are hampered by the weather and the rough terrain.
 According to the Ngo, doctors without borders, and the world health organization, it is the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 The Angola spokesperson, Richard Veerman, said,
 The matches began at 10 am with a beautiful day and, apart from the drizzle of the middle of the morning which quickly dissipated, it was a perfect day for Rugby Sevens.
 South Africa, at the top of the table, started well by beating Zambia, who are fifth in the table, 26-0.
 South Africa, which had been decidedly rusty in its match against its fellow Southerners,
 Their well-disciplined defense, their skill in controlling the ball, and their formidable teamwork had made them stand out, and it was obvious that they were the team to beat.
 The city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with a fungus and is a public health hazard,
 He was due to be executed on Tuesday, but was saved after a last-minute court decision.
 All the entrances to the caves, which have been named the seven sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 The infrared images reveal, through the variations of temperature during the day and the night, that they are probably caves.
 They are cooler than the surrounding surface during the day and warmer at night.
 Their thermal behavior is not as stable as that of the large caves of the planet that maintain a constant temperature, but they are alike in that they are deep holes in the earth,
 In France, the vote is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters isolate themselves in a booth,
 After the agents have verified the voter's identity, the voter throws the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter's card.
 The French electoral code regulates operations quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the urns must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no envelopes are present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelopes are added, except those of the duly counted and authorized voters.
 Candidates may send representatives to attend each step of the process, and the votes are counted by volunteers under high surveillance,
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously launched worldwide for reasons of economy and Functionality, became a hot topic at the Taipei IT month of 2007.
 But the notebook market will be profoundly disrupted and diversified after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 by the executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website describes the show as a, quote, old school radio theater with a new and scandalous, quote, geeky turn.
 Initially, the show was only broadcast on the venerable Internet radio station TogiNet radio,
 In 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 At first, the show featured amateur voice actors from East Texas.
 The widespread looting continued through the night, with no police presence in the streets of Bichkek.
 An observer described Bichkek as being in the process of sinking into anarchy, while the population was moving in bands through the streets and looting the shops of consumer goods.
 Several residents of Bichkek have blamed the protesters in the South for the anarchy.
 South Africa beat New Zealand in a Tri-Nations Rugby match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The match was played to a point, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it was the end of a five-match losing streak.
 It was the last game of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks before.
 The final match of the championship will take place at the Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week,
 A moderate earthquake shook West of Montana at 22:08 Monday.
 The United States Geological Survey and its National earthquake information center have not received immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was about 20 kilometers north and northeast of Dillon, and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 The H5N1 strain of the deadly bird flu virus has been confirmed as having infected a dead wild duck found Monday in a marsh near Lyon in the east of France.
 France is the seventh country in the EU to be hit by the virus, following Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 The suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for the widespread, destruction, and terror inflicted on millions and millions of earth's inhabitants.
 Chambers, an Angel, affirms that his trial is a farce and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story presented in the opera, by Camille Saint-Saens, is that of an artist,
 As a result, artists smoke marijuana on stage, and the theatre itself encourages the audience to join them.
 Newt Gingrich, the former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, the governor of Texas, and Senator Michele Bachmann,
 After the publication of the results, Newt Gingrich congratulated Rick Santorum, but had harsh words for Mitt Romney,
 Perry stated that he would return to Texas to evaluate the results of the caucus that night, and determine if there was a path for him in the race,
 Bachmann, who had won the straw poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA medical center, where he died from his injuries.
 According to some sources, he is around twenty years old, and in a statement, Bieber said,
 The photographer allegedly stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take pictures of the police stop before he crossed the road and continued,
 According to the police, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be prosecuted.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, a number of countries have failed to make it onto the podium of medal winners.
 They include the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen who finished ninth in the women's super-G yesterday, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen who finished tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley is 11th in the men's Super-G, and the Czech Oldrich Jelinek is 16th in the men's Super-G.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez finished fifteenth in the men's Super-G, and the New Zealander Adam hall finished ninth in the men's Super-G.
 The Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are accused of spreading the disease that started near the troops' camp.
 According to the trial, the UN camp's waste was not properly disposed of, causing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti had not encountered any problems related to disease since the eighteen hundred s.
 The Haitian Institute for justice and democracy has referred to independent studies that suggest the UN Nepalese peacekeeping battalion involuntarily brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was probably caused by the UN peacekeepers.
 Hamilton has confirmed that the Howard University hospital has admitted the patient in a stable condition.
 The patient had traveled to Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola have been reported.
 The hospital has respected the protocol for the prevention of infections, including the isolation of the patient in order to avoid a possible infection of other patients.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon had worked on several other shows, occupying various positions.
 During the 1980s, he worked on shows such as Taxi, Cheers, and the Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening and was responsible for the hiring of the first team of writers of the series.
 Despite his departure from the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars each season in royalties.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua had previously announced the news of the hijacking of an airplane.
 Later reports revealed that the plane had been the target of a bomb threat and had been redirected to Kandahar, Afghanistan, to land.
 The first reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after being refused an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air accidents are frequent in Iran, which has an ageing and poorly maintained fleet for both civil and military flights.
 Because of the international sanctions, it is not possible to buy new planes.
 At the beginning of this week, an accident with a police helicopter killed three people and injured three others.
 Last month, Iran experienced its worst air disaster in years when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 The same month, another airliner made a runway excursion at Mashhad and hit a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The Aerosmith group has canceled the last concerts of its tour.
 The rock group was to tour the United States and Canada until the sixteenth of September.
 They canceled the tour after the singer Steven Tyler was injured in a fall from the stage during a concert on August five.
 Murray lost the first set in the tie break after both men had held their serve throughout the set.
 Despite the net advantage of Del Potro during the second set, it was necessary to go to a tie-break once the score reached 6-6.
 Potro received treatment for his shoulder at this time, but managed to return to the match.
 The program started at 20:30 local time,
 Famous singers from all over the country have sung bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening was commenced by Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, and Lakkha Singh presented the bhajan of Chhappan Bhog,
 Lakkha Singh then took the lead in singing the bhajans.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog were served to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh, on the other hand, presented the chhappan bhog bhajan,
 On Thursday, during the main presentation of the Tokyo Game Show, Nintendo's President, Satoru Iwata, revealed the design of the new Nintendo Revolution Console's Controller.
 Identical to a television remote control, the Controller uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in Video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and finished the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate, Fernando Alonso, dominated the race, but his stop at the pit stop was ended by a loose front right wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished his race shortly after Alonso, due to the damage he had sustained to the suspension of his car.
 She is very pretty, and she sings very well, too,
 I was moved every time we did a rehearsal on this subject,
 About three minutes after launch, a camera showed numerous pieces of insulating foam detaching from the fuel tank.
 But we don't think they caused any damage to the shuttle.
 The head of NASA's shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had fallen off after the time that we're concerned about.
 Five minutes after the start of the exhibition, a wind starts to blow, reaching about one minute later the speed of 70 km per hour.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way, there were two people in a wheelchair,
 The NHK also said that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. has reported no effect from the earthquake, and its Shika nuclear power plant's number one and two reactors have been shut down.
 We're hearing that about 9,400 homes in the area are without water,
 Some roads have been damaged, the railway service has been suspended in the affected areas, and the Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport is still closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor's office.
 Three other bombs exploded near government buildings in the space of two hours.
 Some reports say the death toll is eight, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured, but the final death toll is not yet known.
 Cyanuric acid and Melamine were found in the urine samples taken from the animals that died after eating the contaminated pet food.
 The two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the kidney's function, researchers at the University of California have said.
 The investigators discovered that crystals had formed in the urine of cats as a result of the presence of these two supplements,
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to what is found in the urine of domestic animals affected when compared by infrared spectroscopy.
 I don't know if you're aware of this, but most of the goods coming from Central America are exempt from taxes.
 Yet 80% of our goods were being taxed by customs duties in the countries of Central America.
 That didn't seem right to me, it was certainly not fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us as we treat you.
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, has signed a law that prohibits the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The bill would require that violent Video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a sticker bearing the words,
 The director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning announcing the prosecution of Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by the MP Ed Davey, and the MP Norman Lamb is expected to take over as Minister of State for Health.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear before the Westminster Magistrates' Court on 16 February.
 The victims are Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and the jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo reconstructive surgery for his face.
 Uka's weapon jammed as it was pointed at the head of a fifth man, Schneider is in constant pain, has lost an eye, and has had his skull reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider has testified via Video-Link from an Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to the event on Wednesday, Carpanedo participated in two individual races during the championships.
 She first competed in the slalom, where she finished in 116th place, out of 116 competitors.
 Her other race, the slalom, allowed her to finish in the tenth place of the women's group, with a combined time of 4:41.30, which is 2:11.60 minutes less than the Austrian Claudia Loesch, who finished first, and 1:09.02 minutes less than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 In the women's skiing category, four skiers did not finish their runs in the slalom,
 The Madhya Pradesh police have recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The inspector general assistant D.K. Arya stated,
 The accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the police Commissioner, said the accused had their faces covered when they appeared before the court.
 Although three people were in the house when the car hit it, no one was injured.
 However, the driver was severely injured in the head.
 The road where the accident took place was temporarily blocked to allow the emergency services to extract the driver of the Audi TT.
 He was first taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to the Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has since been charged with the murder of her son by the Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is in custody awaiting trial, but eye-witness accounts could be compromised because her picture has been widely circulated.
 It's a common practice in the rest of the United Kingdom, but the Scottish justice system works differently, and the courts have said that publishing the pictures would be potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson, of the University of Dundee, notes that,
 The office of the Attorney General, which is in charge of all prosecutions, has told the press that no other comment will be made until the indictment is filed.
 According to the leak, the document will focus on the dispute over the border that Palestine claims based on the pre-war borders of the Middle East.
 Among other topics discussed are the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the West Bank.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for a period of ten years from the signing of an agreement, while the Palestinian authority only agrees to a period of five years.
 The additional tiremen of the parasite control were to be closely watched by rangers, as the trial was controlled and its efficiency evaluated.
 In partnership with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting head of conservation at the NPWS, the four shooters designated for the first culling campaign were duly trained and briefed on safety procedures.
 Martelly has installed a new provisional electoral Council, or CEP, yesterday, consisting of nine members.
 It's the fifth PEC in four years.
 Last month, a Presidential Commission recommended the dissolution of the previous CEP as part of a package of measures to move the country towards new elections.
 This Commission was the response of Martelly to the vast protests against his regime that began in October.
 These protests, sometimes violent, were triggered by the absence of elections, some of which were due to take place in 2011.
 About sixty cases of defective iPods were reported, resulting in a total of six fires and leaving four people with minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry has said it has been notified of 27 incidents linked to these devices.
 Last week, the METI announced that apple had informed them of 34 additional incidents, which the company has called, quote, Non-Serious.
 The Ministry has reacted by describing the report's delay as being, quote,
 The earthquake hit the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a M . local time.
 The office of the Mayor of the Northern Mariana Islands said no damage had been reported in that country.
 The tsunami warning center in the Pacific said there was no sign of a tsunami.
 An ex-police officer in the Philippines has taken tourists in Hong Kong hostage by hijacking their bus in the Philippines' capital, Manila.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued, and the deaths of at least six of them have been confirmed so far.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were prematurely released, as were the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then took the place of an elderly woman who needed to go to the toilet, and Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and went into a career as a doctor.
 He followed a training as an Obstetrician, and began working at the National Women's hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 When he was working at the hospital, Liggins began to look into premature births in his own time.
 His research showed that if a hormone was administered, it would speed up the baby's lung maturation.
 The investigators have recovered two black boxes from the wreckage of the plane.
 The other wrestlers have also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer stated, quote, Luna was the first Queen of the extreme.
 Dustin Runnels commented that Luna was as bizarre as me,
 A poll taken before the 2010 Federal election showed that the number of people opposed to Australia becoming a Republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 The interim Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, stated during the 2010 Federal election campaign that she thought Australia should become a Republic at the end of the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 Thirty four percent of those polled share this view, and wish that Queen Elizabeth II should be the last monarch to reign over Australia.
 At the extremes of the poll, 29% of people think that Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible,
 The Olympic gold medalist was to compete in the 100 and 200-meter freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth games, but because of his complaints, his physical condition was put into question.
 He was unable to take the medication he needed to overcome his pain, as it was banned from the games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Central Missouri, discovered on January twenty five the largest prime number known to date.
 Several people have verified the discovery using different equipment and software at the beginning of February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have been a source of water and organic matter that could have formed proteins and favored life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets are formed, and more particularly how the earth was formed, since comets have been in collision with it a long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, began his term as governor earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors, bullshit and political bullshit.
 He is expected to run for President in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that would allow planes to fly shorter distances and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, limiting carbon emissions.
 It relies on satellite technology, rather than the ground-based radar systems used previously, which allows air traffic controllers to locate planes with greater precision and to provide pilots with more detailed information.
 The additional transport is non-existent, and the surface trains will not stop at Wembley, and the parking and parking lots are not available on the ground.
 The fear of not being able to get to the game has created the possibility that the game could be played without the fans of the teams.
 A study published Thursday in the Journal Science has traced the genesis of a new bird species in the Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have indicated that the new species evolved in only two generations, although this process is estimated to have been much longer,
 One can shape gold in many ways.
 It can be drawn into thin filaments, which can be twisted and woven into cloth.
 It can be made very thin, and glued to another metal, and it can be so thin that it has sometimes been used to decorate the pictures painted by hand in the books called illuminated manuscripts.
 You can make an indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The juice of cabbage changes color depending on the acidity or basicity of the chemical.
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions, or H, in the chemical being tested.
 The ions of hydrogen are protons that have been deprived of their electron,
 Mix the two dry powders together, then, with clean and humid hands, press them into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the outer layers, which will create a strange sensation and produce a sort of a coating.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had toilets equipped with a flushing system in almost all the houses, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Descendants of the Minoans have been found in the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 There were also toilets in ancient Egypt, Persia and China, and in the Roman civilization, the toilets were sometimes part of the public baths where men and women would bathe together.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite receives the call in space, then it sends it back to earth, almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket, and the scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts some of our light and our vision.
 It takes a giant rocket more than 30 meters high to put a satellite or a telescope into space.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways . The greatest advantage it has given us is that it has made transportation much easier and faster.
 This has brought us the train, the car and many other means of transportation.
 Below are smaller cats that eat smaller prey, from rabbits to antelopes and other small deer.
 In addition, there are numerous small cats, including pet cats, that eat the much larger prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of a niche, a special task assigned to each cat, which prevents them from competing with each other.
 Lions are the most sociable of cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The packs are composed of one to three adult males,
 Women are generally very close to each other, their family being composed of a large number of sisters and daughters.
 The lion troops act like wolves or dogs, animals that are surprisingly similar to lions in their behavior, and also very deadly to their prey.
 An evenly balanced athlete, the tiger can climb, but sometimes with difficulty, swim, jump great distances, and pull with five times the force of a powerful human.
 The tiger is in the same family as the lion, the leopard, and the jaguar,
 The tiger's roar is not like the lion's deep and full roar, but rather like a sentence in which the words would be cries and grunts.
 Ocelots are fond of small animals, they catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds if they can.
 According to scientists, the ocelots track and find their prey by smelling their scent on the ground.
 They see very well in the dark thanks to their night vision, and they move around very stealthily.
 When a small group of living beings, a small population, is separated from the main population from which it came,
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population will need new characteristics or adaptations in order to be a strong competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all,
 Over time, as the new population adapts to its new environment, it begins to look less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they will no longer be considered to belong to the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which simply means the formation of new species.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants produce their food by Photosynthesis, and they also provide shade.
 We make our houses and our clothes from plants, and most of the food we eat is from plants.
 The Mosasaurus was the top predator of its time,
 His long jaws were equipped with over 70 sharp teeth like razor blades, as well as an additional set of teeth in the palate, so that anything that crossed his path could not escape.
 We're not sure, but it's possible that he had a forked tongue, and his diet included turtles, large fish, and possibly even other mosasaurs.
 He also attacked anything that entered the water, even a giant dinosaur like a T . rex.
 Although the Romans consumed foods that we are familiar with, they did eat some strange or unusual dishes, including wild boar, peacocks, snails, and even a rodent called the dormouse.
 Another difference is that while the poor and the woman ate their food while sitting on chairs,
 The foods of ancient Rome could not include these foods of American or Asian origin that were introduced to Europe centuries later.
 For example, they had no maize, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cacao, and no ancient Romans ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a principal temple which was considered the god's home.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods, and the priests tried to meet the needs of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard, then a sanctuary within which only the priests could enter.
 Some pyramid-shaped towers, the Ziggurats, were sometimes built as elements of a temple.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the hot climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 The main part of the life of the Hebrew family took place outdoors.
 The women cooked in the courtyard, the shops were only counters open to the street,
 As there were no great forests in the land of Canaan, wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland has been sparsely populated, and in the Scandinavian Sagas, it is said that Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder,
 But, despite the discovery, Eskimo tribes were already living there at the time.
 Although each country is Scandinavian, there are many differences between the peoples, Kings, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National treasure, you may think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, this is not true, although there is an inscription on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence, you could read the words,
 Although no one knows for sure who actually wrote it, we do know that at an early stage in its existence, the great parchment, which is about 29 inches three quarters by 24 inches,
 It is therefore likely that the notation was added simply as a label.
 The D-Day landings and the battles that followed liberated the North of France, but the South was still not free.
 It was governed by the French of Vichy, the French who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and collaborated with the occupier instead of confronting them.
 On August fourteen, nineteen forty, the Allies landed in the South of France, an invasion called operation Dragoon.
 In just two weeks, the Americans and the French had liberated the South of France and were moving on to Germany.
 A civilization is a shared culture, a set of beliefs and values,
 The word civilization is derived from the Latin word civis, which means citizen,
 The city-states are the precursors of the nation, a civilizational culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a civilizational imprint that is durable and equitable.
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces and are not recognized as true civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary war, the thirteen States first formed a weak central government,
 The Congress had no power to impose taxes and, as there was no executive or judicial power at the national level,
 He also had no power to waive the laws of taxation or to waive the laws on customs duties between the States.
 The articles required unanimous consent from all the States before they could be amended, and the States took the central government so lightly that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, along with the German national football team, the second most successful national football team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, fencing, Rugby, Cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and Formula One.
 The winter sports are the most popular in the northern regions, with Italians participating in international games and in the Olympic events.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 Islands, making it the 7th largest Island in the world.
 Because of the group of Islands that make up the country, Japan is often referred to, from a geographical point of view, as an archipelago.
 The first information about Taiwan dates back to the fifteenth century, while European sailors who passed by it called it Ilha Formosa, or beautiful Island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company established a base in the Southwest of Taiwan,
 In 1683, the forces of the Qing dynasty,
 In 1895, after its defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war,
 The Machu Picchu is composed of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the temple of the sun, and the room of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings around the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of what they looked like originally.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and that restoration continues to this day.
 For example, the most common format of photography in the world is the 35 mm,
 It's still made today, but what's important is that its image format is inherited from the Digital camera's image format.
 The 35mm format is actually, and this is quite confusing,
 And so the ratio of the two is three to two,
 Many common formats, such as the APS family,
 The rule of thirds, which is often maltreated and often turned into ridicule, is a simple directive that inspires dynamism while offering protection to the image.
 He indicates that the most effective place for the main subject is at the intersection of the lines dividing the image into thirds vertically and horizontally.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful,
 For more than a thousand years, the Christian religion has bound the European States together, despite differences of language and custom.
 His omnipresent power touched everyone, from the King to the commoner.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to relieve suffering and poverty, and that the church's monetary funds are there specifically for that reason.
 The central authority of the church had been in Rome for over 1000 years and this concentration of power and money has led many people to wonder if this doctrine was being followed.
 Soon after the start of the war, Britain put in place a naval blockade against Germany.
 This strategy proved effective, cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade violated generally accepted and codified international law,
 Britain mined the international waters to prevent ships from venturing into entire maritime zones, thereby posing a threat even to neutral ships.
 As this tactic had only elicited a timid response, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted U-Boat war.
 During the twenty s, most citizens and nations showed a penchant for pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of the first World War, nations have wished to avoid such a situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to take a job at the Edison company in New York.
 He arrived in the United States with four hundred dollars in his pocket, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 Ancient China had a unique way of showing the different eras, each era or each family that was in power was a different dynasty.
 And between each dynasty, there was also an unstable age of divided provinces,
 During these periods, there were fierce struggles between many members of the nobility who were fighting for the throne.
 The three kingdoms were one of the most bloody periods in the history of ancient China.
 There are many social and political repercussions such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to Republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people and not to a single leader.
 And after the Revolution, the trades were open to all male candidates, allowing the most ambitious and the most talented to succeed.
 The same is true of the Army, because the ranking of the Army is no longer based on class, but on caliber.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working classes in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in questions that went beyond the worldly sphere, and he used to frequent a cave on the mountain of Noor,
 The cave itself, which has survived to the present day, gives a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 Situated at the top of one of the mountains to the north of Mecca, the cave is totally isolated from the rest of the world.
 In reality, it's not easy at all to find, even though we know it exists.
 Above, one can see nothing but the clear and magnificent sky and the numerous surrounding mountains.
 The only one of the seven wonders of the world that still exists today is the great pyramid of Giza.
 Built by the Egyptians during the third millennium BC, the great pyramid is one of many giant structures erected in honor of the deceased pharaohs.
 The plateau of Giza, or Giza Necropolis, in the valley of the Kings in Egypt, is home to several pyramids,
 The great pyramid was created to honor the pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor his wives and other family members.
 The symbol for push is a V and the symbol for pull is a stylized letter a with the bottom of the letter missing.
 The top means you start with the point and push the bow, and the bottom means you start with the frog and pull the bow.
 A bow held high generally produces a softer sound, while a bow held low is louder and more assertive.
 Do not hesitate to write your own marks in pencil, but do not forget that the printed marks of the bow are for a musical purpose,
 On October 6, 1789, the King, Louis the sixteenth, the queen, Marie-Antoinette,
 In a carriage, they are driven back to Paris, surrounded by a crowd of people who shout and cry out threats against the King and the queen.
 The King and the queen were obliged, because of the crowd, to have the windows of their carriages opened.
 At one point, a member of the crowd brandished the head of a Royal guard killed at Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The war expenses of American imperialism in the conquest of the Philippines were paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial government to cover a large part of the expenses and interest on the bonds issued in the name of the Philippine government by Wall Street banks.
 And the super profits that would be derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would be the fundamental advantages of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the creation of the order.
 These events took place during the period generally considered as the High Middle Ages, the period of European history from the eleventh to the thirteenth century,
 The high Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages and followed by the late Middle Ages, which by convention end around 1500.
 The term technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas in practice, ranging from technological push or technological determinism to a strict sense in which the destiny of humanity is dictated by a scientific law or laws and their manifestation in technologies.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism agree on two general ideas: the development of technology itself unfolds according to a process that is largely beyond cultural and political influences,
 For example, one could say that the automobile leads necessarily to the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a handful of cars, which is why new methods of production are being developed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 The massive ownership of cars also leads to a greater incidence of accidents on the roads, which leads to the invention of new techniques in the field of health care to treat the resulting injuries.
 The romanticism presented an important element of cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 And the Romanticists would say that geography shaped individuals, and over time,
 In the same way that Paris is known as the fashion capital of the contemporary world,
 Its reputation as an epicenter of luxury began around the year 400, and lasted until around 1100.
 His status declined in the twelfth century, primarily because the crusaders returned laden with such gifts as silk and spices,
 It was at this time that the title of fashion capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its apogee between the tenth and fourteenth centuries.
 At first, the dress was heavily influenced by the Byzantine culture in the East.
 However, because of the slowness of communication, Western modes could be 25 to 30 years behind.
 During the late Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest advances of the time, following the Crusades, was the use of buttons for fastening clothes.
 Subsistence agriculture is agriculture practiced to produce enough food to meet only the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 And the agriculture is a simple, often biological, system using seed that is native to the Ecoregion,
 Historically, most farmers practised subsistence agriculture, and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures bring together individuals who feel neglected by society and who share the same ideas, which allows them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures may be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location, and or sex of the members.
 The criteria that determine a subculture as distinct may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their membership by a distinctive and symbolic use of style, which encompasses fashions, manners, and slang.
 One of the most common ways of illustrating the importance of socialization is to draw on the few unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune, or voluntary abuse,
 These children are considered as feral or wild children, and some of them were abandoned by their parents,
 The wild children may have suffered serious abuse or trauma before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Some would have been raised by animals, some would have lived alone in the wilderness.
 When they are fully raised by Non-Human species, the wild children display almost identical behavior to that of the animals who have raised them, such as fear or indifference to humans.
 While project-based learning should make learning easier and more interesting, support goes even further.
 Support is not a method of learning but rather a way to help learners who are discovering new material such as using a new program or beginning a new project.
 The supports can be both virtual and real . In other words, a teacher is one form of support, but the little man in Microsoft office is another.
 The virtual scaffoldings are integrated into the software and are intended to question, guide and explain procedures that might have been too difficult for the student alone.
 The children are placed in foster homes for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse,
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment that is not stimulating, nurturing and educational, but that is the case.
 We see the family placement system as a zone of safety for these children.
 Our system of foster care is supposed to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 The placement in a foster home is supposed to provide all the necessities that were lacking in the home from which they were previously removed.
 The Internet combines elements of mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of the approaches to and gratifications from the Internet.
 For example, learning and socialization are considered to be major factors in the use of the Internet.
 The personal involvement and the ongoing relationship were also identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord,
 The use of Video-Recording has led to great discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions,
 It's claimed that you can detect if a person is lying by correctly interpreting micro expressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article, the President's Speech, indicated how people who could not understand speech due to brain damage were nevertheless able to assess the sincerity of the speech.
 He suggests that such abilities to interpret human behavior may be found in animals such as domestic dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two reservoirs of genetic variation,
 The mutation adds a new genetic variation, and selection removes it from the reserve of expressed variations.
 Segregation and recombination alternate the variations between the two basins at each generation.
 In the savannah, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system similar to that of humans to satisfy its needs in amino acids from the vegetable resources available.
 In addition, an absence of response has serious consequences: growth retardation, malnutrition, and ultimately, death.
 The most easily accessible vegetable resources would be the proteins contained in leaves and legumes, but these are difficult to Digest for primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, food of animal origin, such as ants, termites, and eggs,
 All things considered, we should not be surprised if our own ancestors solved their own protein problem in much the same way that the savanna chimpanzees do today.
 The interruption of sleep is the process of intentionally waking up during your period of sleep and then falling asleep again for a short period of time,
 This can be done easily by using a relatively quiet alarm clock, so that you can be awakened without being fully awakened.
 If you find yourself having to reset the clock while you're asleep, it can be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 The other biological based possibilities include drinking a lot of fluids before going to bed,
 The degree of inner peace of a person is inversely proportional to the degree of tension in his or her body and mind.
 The more the tension is low, the more the vital force is positive, and every person has the possibility to find an absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can achieve enlightenment . The only thing that stands in the way of that is our own tension and our own negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been enriched by the Mahayana path of love and by many of the techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple it consists of Kundalini yoga, meditation, and the way of universal love.
 With Kundalini yoga, the Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras and visualizations.
 The center of Tibetan meditation is the yoga of the deity,
 Germany was a common enemy during the second World War, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the United States.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies had become enemies and the cold war had begun.
 It was to last for the next 40 years and would see real affronts, through armies of substitution, on battlefields as well in Africa as in Asia, in Afghanistan, in Cuba and in many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize along the Polish-Romanian border.
 But these plans became obsolete almost overnight, when more than 800,000 Soviet soldiers of the Eastern bloc,
 The use of ships for the transportation of goods is by far the most efficient way to move large quantities of people and goods across the oceans.
 The work of the marines traditionally has been to ensure that your country maintains the ability to move your people and your goods, while interfering with your enemy's ability to move his people and his goods.
 One of the most remarkable examples of this situation was the North Atlantic campaign during the Second World War, when the Americans were trying to get soldiers and equipment across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using primarily U-Boats,
 If the Allies had failed, Germany probably would have conquered Britain as it had conquered the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Cultures and ancient tribes started keeping them close by for easy access to milk, hair, meat, and skins.
 Goats were generally kept in herds that wandered on the hills or other grazing grounds, often tended by children or adolescents,
 Wagonways were built in England as early as the sixteenth century.
 Although the wagonways were simply made of parallel boards of wood,
 The Croisillons were introduced early on to maintain the tracks in place, but it was soon realized that the tracks would be more effective if they were equipped with a strip of iron on the top.
 This became a common practice, but the iron caused more wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 And finally, the wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first iron rails made their appearance.
 The first means of locomotion was walking,
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus,
 We find bipedal specializations in the Australopithecus of 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as seven million years ago.
 We can start by living in a better harmony with the environment, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even militate in order to alleviate the suffering that is to come.
 In many cases, it is a symptomatic treatment, but if we do not want only a temporary solution, we must find the root of the problems and deactivate them.
 It is clear that the world has changed a great deal thanks to the scientific and technological advances made by human beings, and that the problems have become more serious because of the overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of humanity.
 After its adoption by the Congress on July four, a handwritten draft signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson,
 During the night, between one hundred and fifty and two hundred were made, today known as the Dunlap Broadsides.
 The first public reading of the document was done by John Nixon in the court of Independence hall on July eight.
 One of them was sent to George Washington on the 6th of July, which he read to his troops in New York on the 9th of July.
 The 25 Dunlap sheets that we know of are the oldest copies of the document.
 Many paleontologists think today that a group of dinosaurs survived and are still alive.
 Few people consider them dinosaurs, given that they have wings and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have feet covered with scales and provided with claws, they lay eggs and walk on their two hind legs like T-Rex.
 Practically all computers in use today are based on the manipulation of information that is coded in Binary form.
 A Binary number can have only one of two values, zero or one, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or bits, to use the computer jargon.
 An internal poisoning may not be visible immediately, symptoms such as vomiting are so general that an immediate diagnosis cannot be made.
 The best indicator of internal poisoning is probably the presence of an open container of toxic household chemicals or drugs.
 Consult the label for specific first aid instructions for this poison.
 The term insect is used by entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 This term derives from an ancient familiarity with bed bugs, which are insects that are very well adapted to parasitize humans.
 The bed bugs, like the bed bugs, are nidicolous, that is, adapted to live in the nest or habitat of their host.
 In the United States, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis,
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve.
 Research has shown that women are two times more likely to have multiple sclerosis than men.
 A couple may well consider that it is not in their interest, nor in the interest of the child,
 These couples may choose to do an adoption plan for their baby.
 In the case of adoption, the biological parents terminate their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method,
 But it's not the only one, experimentation is a test that serves to eliminate one or more of the possible hypotheses,
 Naturalists and philosophers have focused on the ancient texts, and in particular, on the Bible in Latin.
 Aristotle's opinions on all scientific questions, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the decline of knowledge of Greek, the West found itself cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many rhythms observed in physiology and behavior often depend in large part on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not simply responses to periodic external stimuli, have been documented in most living things,
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue a cycle of functioning for a certain period of time even in the absence of external stimulation.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the main indications that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phages, or viruses, to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They carried out two experiments to mark either the phage's DNA with a radioactive phosphorus,
 Mutations can have a number of different effects depending on the type of Mutation, the importance of the part of the genetic material that is affected, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only the changes in the germ cells can be passed on to the children, while other changes can lead to the death of the cells or cancer.
 Ecotourism is of interest to people who want to visit natural areas in order to enjoy the scenery,
 Hunting, fishing, bird watching, visiting parks, and studying the ecosystem are all examples of activities on the ground.
 You can go and see, photograph, and discover the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small towns in their cars to go to work and they meet other people who are going to work in the small towns they have just left.
 In this dynamic transportation system, everyone is connected to some degree to a system based on private cars and support.
 Science now shows that this carbon-based economy has dislodged the biosphere from its state of stability that has supported human evolution for two million years.
 Everyone is part of the society and uses the transportation systems.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear so many complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems break down so often? are the engineers of transport simply incompetent? or is there something more fundamental going on?
 The flow of traffic is the study of the movements of drivers and vehicles between two points, and the interactions they exercise between them.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the flow of traffic because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted one hundred percent.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to act within a reasonably consistent range, so traffic flows tend to have a reasonable consistency and can be represented mathematically in an approximate way.
 To better represent the traffic flow, relationships have been established between the three main characteristics,
 These relationships help with planning, designing, and operating of roadway facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly, and their ability to fly allowed them to escape their enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings along the body.
 This gives them a greater number of small places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are the dragon flies and the mayflies.
 A few thousand years ago, a man called Aristarchus claimed that the solar system was moving around the sun.
 Some thought he was right, but many believed the opposite that the solar system was moving around the earth, including the sun and even the other stars.
 This seems reasonable, because the earth doesn't seem to be moving, does it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the largest river on earth.
 The Amazon is also the largest River in the world, sometimes reaching up to 10 kilometers wide.
 As much as twenty percent of the water that flows into the oceans of the world comes from the Amazon.
 The main branch of the Amazon is 6,387 kilometers long,
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the Giza pyramids were never surpassed in size or technical excellence.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were amazed at the monuments of their predecessors,
 The Vatican is the smallest independent country in the world, and the least populated.
 The Vatican City State issues its own stamps and currency,
 The Italian is also the everyday language used by most people who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 The citizens of the Vatican city are all Catholics.
 Since ancient times, people have been familiar with the basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper, because they are found in nature in a raw form and are quite simple to mine with primitive tools.
 Aristotle, a philosopher, theorized that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of the four elements,
 He was more interested in the four states of matter, solid, liquid, gas and plasma, although he also expressed the theory that these latter transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are essentially a mixture of two or more metals . remember, the periodic table contains many elements.
 Elements such as calcium and potassium are considered metals, and of course there are also metals such as silver and gold.
 We also find alloys that include a small amount of Non-Metallic elements, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter, and all matter is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that billions of them could fit into the period at the end of this sentence.
 And the pencil was a good friend to many people when it came out.
 Unfortunately, the advent of new writing styles has relegated the pen to a more confidential and less common use.
 People write messages on computer screens now, without ever having to approach a pencil.
 One can only wonder what the keyboard will become when the next new thing comes along.
 The fission bomb works on the principle of assembling a nucleus of a myriad of protons and neutrons.
 It's a bit like if you were to climb a hill with a heavy cart,
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, so they tend to break apart with little or no pressure.
 The surface of the moon is made up of stones and dust, and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The thickness of the crust is about 70 km on the visible side and about 100 km on the hidden side.
 It is thinner at the level of the seas and thicker under the continents.
 There may be more Maria on the near side because the crust is thinner and it was easier for the lava to move up to the surface.
 Theories of content are centered on the search for what makes people feel good or what they are attracted to.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and or desires that have been internalized as they matured towards adulthood.
 These theories examine what drives certain people to want the things they do and what drives them to do or not do certain things in their environment.
 Two theories of popular content are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, two behaviors can emerge when a manager becomes the boss of former colleagues,
 This type of manager has a hard time making unpopular decisions, taking disciplinary action,
 At the other end of the spectrum, one becomes an unrecognizable individual who feels that he or she must change everything that the group has created up to that point and do things in his or her own way.
 After all, the chief is ultimately responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to dissension between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 The teams are subject to the same standards of excellence as the conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Members of a virtual team often function as the point of contact for their immediate physical team.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members because their teams can come together based on different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The presence of a real, invisible team is also a unique element of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the management team to which each member reports.
 Why would an organization want to go through the cumbersome process of creating a learning structure?
 When all the available resources are used effectively in the functional services of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can be fully expressed.
 And so the process of working together to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new process of innovation to meet the customer's need.
 Before an organization can be innovative, its leadership must create a culture of innovation, shared knowledge, and its own culture of learning.
 Angel, in two thousand and six, presents the Continuum approach as a method used to help organizations achieve better results.
 Neurobiological data provide material evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition,
 The correlation between brain pathology and behaviour supports scientists in their research.
 We have known for a long time that different types of brain damage, injury, Tumours and trauma,
 The rise of new technologies allows us to see and study brain structures and processes that have never been seen before.
 This gives us a lot of information and material to build models of simulation that help us to understand the processes in our mind.
 Although artificial intelligence is often heavily connoted with science fiction, it represents a very important part of computer science, which studies the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of a machine.
 Research in artificial intelligence aims at automating tasks that require an intelligent approach.
 Among the examples are control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to diagnostics and questions from customers, as well as the recognition of writing, voice and face.
 These practices led to distinct disciplines, focused on solving the problems of everyday life.
 The IA system is now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, as it has been put into place in several home computer and Video-Game software.
 Field trips are an integral part of any school class, and often a teacher would like to take his or her students to places where a bus trip is not feasible.
 The solution is provided by technology in the form of virtual field trips, where students can look at museum artifacts, visit an Aquarium, or admire a beautiful work of art while sitting with their class.
 Participating in a field trip is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share your experiences with future generations.
 For example, students at Bennett high school in North Carolina create a Website each year about their visit to the state capital, and each year the Website is updated, but the old versions are kept Online to serve as an Archive.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills . Even though students often try the Blog experience with poor grammar and spelling,
 As students are often the most critical audience, the Blogger begins to strive to improve his writing to avoid criticism.
 And it also makes them more aware of the world around them.
 Blogs are a tool that stimulate collaboration and encourage students to continue their learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 When used appropriately, Blogs can help students to strengthen their critical thinking skills by allowing them to actively confront their own views with those of others.
 Ottawa is the charming bilingual capital of Canada and has a large number of art galleries and museums that showcase the past and the present of Canada.
 To the South, you will find Niagara falls and to the North, the Muskoka region and its environs, which have a natural beauty that is unparalleled.
 All of these measures, and many others, make Ontario what foreigners consider the Quintessence of Canada.
 There are large areas to the north that are sparsely populated and some are almost uninhabited in a wild state.
 For a comparison of the population, which is surprising to many,
 The Islands of East Africa are located in the Indian ocean, off the coast of East Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest country, and even a continent unto itself, when it comes to fauna.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent, or associated with France, and are known to be luxury resorts.
 The Arabs also brought the practice of Islam to the Comoros and Mayotte,
 The European influence and colonialism began in the fifteenth century, at the time when the Portuguese explorer Vasco de Gama discovered the Cape route that connected Europe to India.
 To the North, the region is delimited by the Sahel, and to the South and West by the Atlantic ocean.
 To women: It is recommended that any woman who travels should say that she is married, regardless of her marital status.
 It is also advised to wear an alliance, which should not look too precious.
 Women must realize that certain cultural differences can lead to what they consider to be harassment,
 Be firm in the refusal of advances from men, and do not be afraid to stand your ground.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, and was used by the Phoenicians, the Romans, and the Merinids as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese, who had rebuilt it after destroying it, and renamed it Casa Branca, finally abandoned it in 1755 after an earthquake.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the town under the name of Daru l-Badya, and it was renamed Casablanca by the Spanish traders who established trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places in all of Morocco to shop.
 Around the old medina, you can easily find places to buy traditional Moroccan products, like tagines, pottery, leather goods, narghiles and all sorts of trinkets,
 Goma is a tourist town located in the extreme East of the Democratic Republic of Congo, near Rwanda.
 In two thousand and two, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city, in particular the city center.
 Although Goma is reasonably safe, any visit outside of Goma must be researched to understand the state of the fighting that continues in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of Nyiragongo volcano as well as for treks to see the mountain gorillas,
 You can use boda-boda's to get around in Goma. The normal price is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Combined with its relative inaccessibility, Timbuktu has become a metaphor for distant and exotic lands.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city, although its reputation makes it a tourist attraction, and it has an airport.
 In two thousand and three, it was removed from the list of endangered sites,
 It was one of the main stops on Henry Louis Gates's PBS show, Wonders of the African world.
 The city contrasts strongly with the other cities of the country,
 The Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa and borders Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north, and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The total area of the park is 19,500 square kilometres, which is divided into fourteen Ecozones,
 It is one of the most well-known amusement parks in South Africa and is considered the flagship of South African National Parks.
 As with all South African national parks, there are daily entrance and conservation fees for the park.
 It can be advantageous to get a Wildcard that gives you access to certain South African parks, as well as to all South African national parks.
 Hong Kong Island gives its name to the territory of Hong Kong and is the main center of interest for many tourists.
 The row of buildings that draws the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a scintillating bar graph that is reflected in the waters of Victoria harbor.
 To admire the most beautiful panoramas of Hong Kong, leave the island and go to the Kowloon waterfront opposite.
 The vast majority of Hong Kong's urban development is concentrated on the North shore land.
 And the other thing is that it's a place that the British invested in,
 The Sundarbans are the world's largest mangrove swamp, extending 80 kilometers from the coast to the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterlands.
 The Sundarbans have been declared a UNESCO world heritage site, and the part of the forest located in the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests, however, are not composed solely of Mangrove swamps, but also contain some of the last remnants of the majestic jungles that once covered the plain of the Ganges.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 square kilometres, of which about a third is covered by water and marshes.
 Sundarbans is a nature reserve since 1966, you can find there around 400 Royal Bengal tigers and 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses leave from the Inter-District bus station on the other side of the river, but most, especially those that go to the East and Jakar,
 The inter-district buses are often full, so it is advised to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most of the districts are served by small Japanese cabotage boats, which are comfortable and sturdy.
 The taxis are a fast and comfortable way to get to nearby places such as Paro and Punakha.
 The Oyapock bridge is a suspension bridge that spans the Oyapock River to connect the cities of Oiapoque, Brazil, and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 meters high, and it is 378 meters long with two lanes of 3.50 meters wide.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters, and the structure was completed in August 2011, but it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge should be fully operational in September 2017, when the Brazilian customs posts should be completed.
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group living in what is now Eastern Paraguay, living as hunter-gatherers and also practicing some agriculture.
 Other indigenous tribes that peopled the Chaco, such as the Guaycurú or the Payaguá,
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay, once called the giant province of the Indies, was born from the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous populations.
 The Spaniards inaugurated the period of colonization, which lasted three centuries.
 Since the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve a large part of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams and some of the best players of polo in the world.
 The biggest tournament of the year takes place in December on the polo grounds of Las Cañitas.
 In addition, there are also smaller tournaments and matches of lesser importance that are sometimes held here at other times of the year.
 For information on tournaments and places to buy tickets for polo matches,
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent to one pound sterling.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank in the Islands, located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 The pound sterling is a commonly accepted currency throughout the Islands, while in Stanley, credit cards and U S . dollars are also often accepted.
 On the surrounding Islands, credit cards will probably not be accepted, even though British and American currencies may be.
 It is almost impossible to exchange money from the Falklands outside of the Islands, so change it before you leave the Islands.
 Montevideo, being located south of the equator, has winter in the northern hemisphere and summer in the southern hemisphere.
 Montevideo is located in a subtropical zone and summer temperatures exceeding thirty degrees Celsius are common.
 The winters can be deceptively cold the temperatures rarely drop below zero, but the wind and the humidity combine to make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no real seasons of rain and dryness,
 Although many of the park's animals are accustomed to seeing humans,
 According to the park authorities, you must stay at least 100 meters away from bears and wolves and at least 25 meters away from all other wild animals.
 As docile as they may appear, the bison, the deer, the moose, the bear, and almost all the great animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they have not kept a safe distance, so give them space.
 In addition, know that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid carrying or cooking odorous foods and keep the camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, and is located on the island of Upolu, with a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the site of a naval standoff in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All the ships were sunk, except for a British cruiser,
 The chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, was assassinated during a peaceful rally in the town, during the Mau movement.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is on two harbours, and the most popular are in three areas.
 The beaches of the North Shore, which are in the North Harbour district,
 Almost all beaches are sandy and allow for safe swimming, and most are shaded by pohutukawa.
 The beaches of Tamaki drive are on the Waitemata harbour, in the chic suburb of Mission Bay and St Heliers in the centre of Auckland.
 These beaches, sometimes very crowded by families, have many shops along the shore, and swimming is safe.
 The main local beer is the Number One, a fairly ordinary but tasty and refreshing beer,
 There are many French wines to be tasted, but New Zealand and Australian wines may travel better.
 You can drink the local tap water safely, but you can easily find bottled water if you have any concerns about it.
 For Australians, the idea of a cappuccino is a strange one,
 The hot chocolate is in line with Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive but excellent.
 Numerous trips to the reef are made throughout the year, and injuries from one of these causes on the reef are rare.
 Nevertheless, follow the advice of the authorities, obey all the signs, and pay particular attention to the safety warnings.
 From October to April, north of 1770, the box jellyfishes arrive near beaches and estuaries of rivers.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans, and most of them are afraid of humans and would stay away from them.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live actively in the ocean, but their habitat is primarily in the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton.
 The advance reservation gives the traveler the peace of mind of knowing that he will have a place to sleep when he arrives at his destination.
 The first known transportation was walking, humans began walking upright two million years ago with the emergence of Homo Erectus.
 Travel agencies generally offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even packages that include the flight and the accommodation.
 They can also hold the booking for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get other documents you may need for your destination, for example, a visa.
 Any modification or request must be addressed to the travel agency first and not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the majority of participants decide to camp on site, and most consider it an integral part of the experience.
 If you want to participate in the musical event, you're going to have to arrive early to find a good camping spot.
 And please remember that even though the main music shows are over on the main stages,
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you are crossing the North Sea in winter, be sure to check the location of the cabin, as the ice may cause unbearable noises at the most exposed cabins.
 Cruises to St . Petersburg include time spent in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement.
 Casinos generally make many efforts to maximize the time and money spent by customers.
 They typically offer special deals on food, drinks and entertainment to keep the guests in the mood and to keep them on the premises.
 On some sites, it's the locals who offer free alcoholic drinks, but the truth is that drinking alcohol impairs judgment, and all good players know that it's crucial to stay sober.
 Anyone who travels by car to high latitudes or crosses mountain passes should consider the possibility of snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On icy and snowy roads, the friction is low and you cannot drive as if you were on the asphalt.
 During blizzards, it can fall in a very short time enough snow to block you.
 The visibility can also be limited by snow or ice on the windows of the vehicle.
 On the other hand, the presence of ice and snow is normal in many countries, and traffic is practically uninterrupted all year round.
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable time for many visitors.
 In common usage, the term safari means a trip to Africa,
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach vehicles closely, and the standard equipment allows for good observation.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and you will see them better with binoculars.
 A safari on foot, also called a walking safari, footing, or a brousse safari,
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic games, after having hosted the games in 1964.
 If you have booked your flights and your accommodation in 2020 before the announcement of the postponement, you may be faced with a difficult situation.
 The policies vary, but as of late March, most of the cancellation policies based on the Coronavirus do not extend through July of 2020,
 Tickets for most events are expected to cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with typical tickets costing around 7,000 yen.
 By passing the wet clothes, one can dry them more easily. Many hotels have an iron and a clothes iron that can be borrowed, even if there are none in the rooms.
 If you don't have an iron or if you don't feel like wearing ironed socks, you can try using a hair dryer, if you have one.
 Avoid letting the fabric overheat, which can cause it to shrink or in extreme cases, burn.
 There are different methods of water purification, some of which are more effective against specific threats.
 In some places, it is enough to boil the water for one minute,
 The efficiency of the filters varies, and if you have a problem, you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter pests they are not familiar with in their home region.
 Parasites can contaminate food, cause irritation or, in the most serious cases, cause allergic reactions, spread venom or transmit infections.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can hurt or kill people by force, are generally not considered as parasites.
 In some localities, the duty-free shops present an opportunity to buy goods exempt from taxes and excise duties.
 Travellers to countries where taxes are high can sometimes make considerable savings, particularly on items such as alcoholic drinks and tobacco.
 The stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont has the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, passing frequently through isolated back country.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, keep an open mind: steep grades, narrow roads, and sharp curves are the norm.
 The speed limits are much lower than in the preceding and succeeding sections, generally from 35 to 40 mph,
 On the other hand, the service is much more frequent here than on many other parts of the route, for example, the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries are rather good, and in Bavaria, they are very rich and varied, similar to those of their neighbor to the South, Austria.
 Fruit tarts are a staple all year round, while apples and pears are baked and cooked all year round,
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts, and popular cakes are often paired with a cup of strong, black coffee.
 If you want small but copious pastries, try the Berliners, also called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish made with herbs and spices, accompanied by meat or vegetables.
 A curry dish may be either solid or liquid, depending on the amount of sauce it contains.
 In the interior regions of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries,
 Indonesia, with its 17,000 Islands, is a generic term that covers a wide variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 When this term is used without other qualification, however, it tends to designate the foods from the central and eastern portions of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, the cuisine of Java offers a range of dishes simply seasoned, the predominant flavors that the Javanese prefer being peanuts, chilies, sugar,
 The stirrups are foot rests for the rider, which hang from each side of the saddle.
 They offer greater stability to the user, but they can pose a security problem,
 If a rider is thrown from a horse, but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he or she could be dragged if the horse runs away.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a fairly narrow,
 Some saddles, particularly English saddles, have safety bars which allow a saddle to fall off the horse if it is pulled backwards by a rider who falls.
 Vallée de Cochamó is the destination of choice for rock climbing in Chile, known as the Yosemite of South America, with many large, different, granite walls and cliffs.
 From the summits, the views of the mountains are unparalleled.
 Downhill winter sports, especially skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve sliding down a snowy slope with skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is a major travel activity that has many aficionados, sometimes called ski bums, who organize their entire vacations around skiing in specific locations.
 The idea of skiing is very old indeed, as some cave paintings show skier-like figures dating back to about 5,000 BC.
 The practice of skiing as a sport dates back at least to the seventeenth century,
 Skiing is also known as Nordic skiing, cross country skiing, or back country skiing.
 This is similar to Alpine skiing, but does not incorporate the use of skis and boots that are much more rigid.
 Think of the ski route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions, you will be able to cover a little bit more distance than on foot, but you will rarely reach the speeds of cross country skiing without a heavy pack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries, so in a typical situation, travelling through several countries would involve several visa applications and passport checks.
 The Schengen area, however, functions a little bit like a single country in this regard.
 As long as you are in this zone, you can generally cross the borders without going through the passport control points.
 In the same way, having a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply separately for a visa for each of the Schengen countries, which saves you time, money and administrative procedures.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique, and some tax agencies define antiques as objects over 100 years old.
 The criteria vary according to the place where one is located, and in some parts of the world,
 Handmade products may be considered as antiques, even if they are less ancient than similar industrial products.
 Reindeer herding is an important livelihood for the Sami, and the culture that surrounds this trade is of great importance to many other professions.
 Even though, according to tradition, all the Sami were not involved in large-scale reindeer herding, they lived off of fishing, hunting, and other similar activities, while also using reindeer primarily as draft animals.
 Nowadays, many Sámi people have modern jobs, and tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi region.
 Although very widely used, particularly among non-Roms, the term Gitan is often considered pejorative because of its association with negative stereotypes and a distorted image of the Roma people.
 If the country you are visiting is the subject of a travel advisory issued by your government,
 You can also use the advice of other governments, but their advice is tailored to their citizens.
 As an example, American citizens in the Middle East could be confronted with different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 The opinions are only a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The opinions presented are often superficial, general, and too simplified compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 The term violent weather is the generic term for any dangerous weather event that may cause damage, serious social disruption, or loss of life.
 The very unfavorable weather conditions can occur anywhere in the world, and they can be of several kinds,
 The winds, hail, excessive rainfall, and fires are all forms and effects of severe weather,
 Extreme weather, regional and seasonal, includes cold snaps, blizzards, and storms of sand or dust.
 It is strongly advised that travellers research the risks of bad weather that may affect their region of destination, knowing that this may have an impact on the itineraries they are planning.
 Anyone who is planning to go to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for a course in a hostile environment will probably give you the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the topics covered here in much more detail, usually with a lot more hands-on experience.
 A training session normally lasts from two to five days and includes role playing, a lot of first aid, and sometimes training in the use of arms.
 The books and magazines dealing with survival in the wilderness are common,
 Travellers who are planning a sex change operation abroad should ensure that they have valid documents for their return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports without a gender designation, or to update documents to match the person's preferred name and gender varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents is just as variable.
 The searches at security checkpoints have also become much more intrusive in the post-September 11 era.
 Transgender people in the preoperative phase should not expect to pass through scanners while maintaining their privacy and dignity.
 The rip currents are the currents that come back from the waves that break on the beach, often on a rock or an equivalent.
 Because of the underwater topography, the return flow is concentrated in a few deeper sections, and a strong current can form there.
 In most cases, deaths are due to exhaustion resulting from attempting to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, the return to swimming is no more difficult than usual.
 Try to aim at a place where you will not be shot at again.
 The reintegration shock occurs earlier than the culture shock,
 Travelers who have had a hard time adjusting to the new culture sometimes have a hard time adjusting back to their home culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you have already adapted to the new culture and have lost some of your original culture.
 At first, when you went abroad, people were probably patient and understanding, knowing that travelers in a new country must adapt.
 People may not anticipate that patience and understanding are also necessary for people returning home.
 The sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting attractions in the area for children.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see them in silence before the show begins.
 The sound and the light are like a history book.
 The Sphinx is placed as the backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are displayed on the pyramids, and the different pyramids are illuminated.
 The Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several nations and have the most number of research stations, sixteen of which are active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km north of the peninsula, and the largest island, King George Island, is home to the town of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Other examples include Livingston and Deception Islands, where the caldera of a still active volcano offers a spectacular natural harbour.
 Ellsworth land is the Southern region of the peninsula, bounded by the Bellingshausen sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula merge into the plateau, and then reappear to form the Ellsworth mountain chain, which is 360 km long and crossed by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, or Sentinel range, contains the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, which reaches a height of 4,892 m.
 In remote places, without a cell phone network,
 A satellite phone generally does not replace a cell phone, because you have to be outside and have a clear view of the satellite to make a call.
 It's a service often used by shipping, including pleasure boats, as well as by expeditions that have data transmission and telephone needs.
 Your local telephone operator should be able to tell you more about the connection to this service.
 Those who plan a sabbatical year have the opportunity to learn by traveling, and more and more of them are choosing that option.
 This formula is particularly appreciated by young people who leave school, as it allows them to take a year off before going to university, without compromising their studies.
 Often, the fact of having taken a year off to study abroad can actually give you better chances of doing higher education in your own country.
 As a rule, there are fees for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is a popular destination for boating and sailing, with thousands of Islands in the lakes and coastal archipelagos.
 You don't necessarily need a yacht in the archipelagoes and on the lakes.
 Although the coastal archipelagoes and the larger lakes are large enough for a yacht, smaller boats or even a Kayak offer a different experience.
 Sailing is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight people.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand are in the same situation, but apart from that, it is a unique case.
 Most cruises on the Baltic are characterized by a prolonged stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you can visit the historic city for a few days, and then return to the ship to sleep at night.
 If you only go to the mainland by cruise ship, you will not need a separate visa.
 The city of Berlin, in Germany, is mentioned in some brochures for the cruise,
 Flying by airplane can be a scary experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if they have never flown before or have experienced a traumatic event.
 We should not be ashamed of it, it is no different from the fears and the concerns that many people have about other things.
 For some, understanding something about how planes work and what happens during a flight can help to overcome a fear that is based on the unknown or on a lack of control.
 The transportation companies are well paid to make quick deliveries, and often, in the context of an urgent repair, the question of time is crucial for the documents, the goods, or the spare parts that are involved.
 On some routes, the big companies have their own planes, but on other routes and for the small companies, there has been a problem.
 If they had sent the goods by air freight, on certain routes, it would have taken days to get through customs and the unloading.
 The only way to get it there faster was to send it as checked baggage,
 The most obvious way to travel first or business class is to pay a large sum of money for this privilege,
 However, this is not a small sum,
 In general, it is useless to try to get reductions for seats in first or business class on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that they can count on a certain type of traveler who is willing to pay very high prices for the privileges of speed and comfort,
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău, and the local language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that suffers from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in eastern Moldova, with its own government and its own currency, but not recognised by any of the United Nations.
 The economic links have been reestablished between these two parts of Moldova, despite the failure of the political negotiations.
 The main religion in Moldova is the Orthodox Christianity.
 With a population of 3.7 million, Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, the second largest port after Istanbul, and an excellent hub.
 The ancient city of Smyrna is today a modern, developed, and thriving commercial center, located around a large Bay, surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, the glassy buildings and the modern shopping centers are dotted with the red tiled roofs of the eighteenth century market,
 The village of Haldarsvik offers views of the neighboring Island of Eysturoy and houses an unusual octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting marble sculptures representing doves on certain graves.
 It is well worth a half-hour's walk through this fascinating village.
 The romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, located to the north, is easily accessible and has been made famous to foreigners by the brilliant description of its splendor by Lord Byron.
 The bus 403 of Scotturb regularly goes to Sintra, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 When you go to the North, do not forget to visit the beautiful sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima, a place worldwide known for the apparitions of Mary.
 And don't forget that you're visiting essentially a charnel house,
 There are still many women and men alive who have survived their stay here, and many others who have seen their relatives murdered or killed by forced labour, Jews or non-Jews indiscriminately.
 Please treat the site with all the dignity, solemnity, and respect it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by marking or scratching graffiti on the structures.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the inhabitants prefer to speak Catalan, a large majority understands it, and practically everyone is able to speak Spanish.
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan, as the law establishes that this is the first official language.
 And yet, Spanish is also widely used in public transportation and other installations.
 The regular announcements in the Metro are made only in Catalan, but the unscheduled announcements are made by an automated system in many languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 Parisians have the reputation of being egocentric, rude, and arrogant.
 Although this stereotype is often inaccurate, the best way to get along in Paris is to behave as well as possible, to act like a good person.
 The abrupt exteriors of the Parisians evaporate rapidly if you show a minimum of courtesy.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is densely wooded, mainly of beech, fir and pine, and has a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 The country has a wide variety of plant communities due to the diversity of its microclimates, soils, and elevation levels.
 The region is also home to a wide variety of animals and birds.
 Rare animals such as the European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the wild cat, and the great gray partridge can be seen there, as well as many other common species.
 When visiting a monastery, women must wear skirts covering their knees and have their shoulders covered.
 Most of the monasteries provide stoles to women who arrive without anything, but if you bring your own, and it's in bright colors, you'll get a smile from the monk or the nun at the entrance.
 And men must wear pants that cover the knees.
 You can also borrow this garment from the stock at the entrance, but as it is not washed after each use, you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of the surrounding areas of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat,
 A simple and popular meal, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli,
 All names, followed by the word Sie, which means you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 It's a great way to distinguish between certain verbs and objects.
 It can also be said that it facilitates reading, although the writing is somewhat complicated by the need to know whether a verb or an adjective is used in a form that is substantivized.
 The pronunciation is relatively easy in Italian, because most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to watch out for are C and G, because their pronunciation varies depending on the vowel that follows them.
 Please also make sure to pronounce the Rs in a distinct way: Caro means dear, and Carro means chariot.
 Persian has a relatively easy and most of the time regular grammar.
 And so, by reading this introduction to Persian grammar, you will learn a lot about Persian grammar and you will be able to understand the sentences better.
 It goes without saying that if you know a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, those who speak a little Spanish might conclude hastily that Portuguese is close enough to it that it is not necessary to study it separately.
 Pre-Modern Observatories are generally obsolete today, and remain in place as museums or sites of education.
 As light pollution at the time was not as preoccupying as it is today, they are generally located in cities or on campuses,
 Most of the modern research telescopes are huge infrastructures placed in remote regions where the atmospheric conditions are favorable.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China where the plum blossom was the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first Cherry blossom festivals were held by the Emperor for himself and other members of the Imperial family only.
 Plants are at their best when they are in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even one.
 If you visit a strictly manicured garden, the taking of specimens will also get you kicked out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally considered to be a very safe place, where it's very easy to get around, and where you can buy almost anything you need once you're there.
 But located in the high tropics, only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to adapt to the heat and the strong sunshine,
 There are also a few buses that go to the North to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Biblical patriarchs, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob,
 Make sure that the bus you are planning to take goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a great theme for a vacation.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, or taking a cruise to interesting sites on the Danube or the Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes for popular hiking and biking trails.
 Noel is one of the most important holidays of the Christian religion, it celebrates the birth of Jesus.
 Many traditions related to these holidays have also been adopted by Non-Believers in Christian countries and by Non-Christians worldwide.
 It is a tradition to spend Easter morning awake in a place where you can see the sun rise.
 There are, of course, theological explanations for this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility rite.
 The more traditional churches often hold a Paschal Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, with the congregations often breaking into the party at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that have arrived on these Islands have done so originally by water, either by swimming or by being carried on floating objects, or by air.
 Because of the great distance that separates them from the continent, the mammals were unable to go all the way, and the giant tortoise became the principal animal of the Galapagos.
 Since the arrival of man in the Galapagos, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you may experience the polar night,
 It's a good time to see the northern lights, because the sky will be dark almost all day.
 As the regions are sparsely populated, and as light pollution is therefore often not a problem,
 The Japanese work culture is more Hierarchical and formal than what Westerners may be used to.
 The costumes are classic work clothes, and the collaborators are called by their last name or by their job title.
 Harmony in the workplace is crucial, because it emphasizes the collective effort rather than the individual achievement.
 Workers often have to get the approval of their superiors for any decision they make and are expected to obey their superiors without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.3476063009528954, 'precisions': [0.6799187207350472, 0.4435864237491908, 0.31153584942272244, 0.22451790633608815], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9120929011970159, 'length_ratio': 0.9157396545447191, 'translation_length': 22638, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 59.156832270542345, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.84315225481987, 'scores': [0.818403959274292, 0.7122659087181091, 0.8988919258117676, 0.42865830659866333, 0.7755449414253235, 0.7151764035224915, 0.881408154964447, 0.7346650958061218, 0.840914785861969, 0.8557617664337158, 0.7900406122207642, 0.8204053044319153, 0.9234000444412231, 0.9141954183578491, 0.8901209235191345, 0.8142653107643127, 0.5626035332679749, 0.8380045294761658, 0.9029164910316467, 0.7880316376686096, 0.9061391949653625, 0.8604378700256348, 0.8094803690910339, 0.7936052083969116, 0.6445879936218262, 0.9363910555839539, 0.8800651431083679, 0.8452233076095581, 0.7867399454116821, 0.8975278735160828, 0.5296158194541931, 0.7910452485084534, 0.8374162316322327, 0.9175180792808533, 0.9590299725532532, 0.897384524345398, 0.7602643370628357, 0.7726618647575378, 0.821523904800415, 0.7423999905586243, 0.7596014738082886, 0.9327250123023987, 0.8866620659828186, 0.924889862537384, 0.864890456199646, 0.5439225435256958, 0.8733806014060974, 0.8936669826507568, 0.9034258723258972, 0.9028781056404114, 0.8376811742782593, 0.9015454649925232, 0.9197314381599426, 0.9119850397109985, 0.9158014059066772, 0.7790651917457581, 0.8834546208381653, 0.7896300554275513, 0.9146420359611511, 0.876770555973053, 0.8383480310440063, 0.9316126704216003, 0.8800351023674011, 0.8156650066375732, 0.7960192561149597, 0.8569668531417847, 0.8439565896987915, 0.6459243893623352, 0.7765520811080933, 0.8671644330024719, 0.8437507152557373, 0.8754335641860962, 0.870878279209137, 0.8001736998558044, 0.809516966342926, 0.7517566084861755, 0.8811083436012268, 0.9163195490837097, 0.9180982112884521, 0.895693838596344, 0.8064253926277161, 0.9024583697319031, 0.8736472129821777, 0.7057169079780579, 0.8915859460830688, 0.8726783990859985, 0.6454914808273315, 0.8138434290885925, 0.914057195186615, 0.8773999810218811, 0.8897688388824463, 0.9144471287727356, 0.8922805190086365, 0.9338052868843079, 0.9100964665412903, 0.9280022978782654, 0.853680431842804, 0.8363087177276611, 0.7949597239494324, 0.831575870513916, 0.9260361194610596, 0.7190775275230408, 0.8142582178115845, 0.9736706614494324, 0.8522542119026184, 0.7070719003677368, 0.832939088344574, 0.895547091960907, 0.562835156917572, 0.8539044260978699, 0.9463391900062561, 0.9013988375663757, 0.9285029172897339, 0.9260469675064087, 0.8907312750816345, 0.8921137452125549, 0.8847526907920837, 0.92156583070755, 0.961920440196991, 0.7921043634414673, 0.49810990691185, 0.8470897674560547, 0.9257563948631287, 0.9080459475517273, 0.9298304319381714, 0.5872061848640442, 0.8913624882698059, 0.89915531873703, 0.9119008183479309, 0.868861734867096, 0.8931353688240051, 0.8865556120872498, 0.8778265118598938, 0.9425563216209412, 0.8523265719413757, 0.9003380537033081, 0.8757704496383667, 0.9112080335617065, 0.9347547888755798, 0.8429742455482483, 0.9184839129447937, 0.8678531646728516, 0.9028013944625854, 0.8772132992744446, 0.798596203327179, 0.7766739726066589, 0.6680189967155457, 0.9049072265625, 0.8403047323226929, 0.8787954449653625, 0.8299093842506409, 0.48774808645248413, 0.841912031173706, 0.765134871006012, 0.6319034099578857, 0.8923820853233337, 0.8045691847801208, 0.7517788410186768, 0.8538910150527954, 0.8914967179298401, 0.9330093860626221, 0.6697858572006226, 0.7127946615219116, 0.894142210483551, 0.8947907090187073, 0.8723918199539185, 0.8473640084266663, 0.8566386103630066, 0.8421436548233032, 0.8011865019798279, 0.8040174245834351, 0.9447278380393982, 0.9144122004508972, 0.837318480014801, 0.8486362099647522, 0.8557096719741821, 0.8022329211235046, 0.845991849899292, 0.931939423084259, 0.9208524823188782, 0.7777135968208313, 0.9219607710838318, 0.9011794328689575, 0.8773109316825867, 0.9067450165748596, 0.920875608921051, 0.9254169464111328, 0.8565644025802612, 0.6353698372840881, 0.6699411273002625, 0.8888805508613586, 0.5770329236984253, 0.7516961693763733, 0.7950773239135742, 0.8710606694221497, 0.9087591171264648, 0.5482680797576904, 0.7774836421012878, 0.8654033541679382, 0.891375720500946, 0.880971372127533, 0.7867229580879211, 0.7966692447662354, 0.7061058282852173, 0.8884760737419128, 0.8712220788002014, 0.8403530716896057, 0.8771359920501709, 0.9232097268104553, 0.9202247262001038, 0.9290594458580017, 0.8681442141532898, 0.9181911945343018, 0.9457170367240906, 0.8944380879402161, 0.9245336651802063, 0.873145341873169, 0.8760254383087158, 0.8990599513053894, 0.9206591844558716, 0.8778916597366333, 0.8812872171401978, 0.9260149002075195, 0.8881741166114807, 0.882388174533844, 0.902630090713501, 0.8682467341423035, 0.893753707408905, 0.8547831177711487, 0.8995468020439148, 0.8347184658050537, 0.8984878659248352, 0.7937652468681335, 0.9447893500328064, 0.5639675855636597, 0.8259552121162415, 0.863785445690155, 0.8870856761932373, 0.940104067325592, 0.9183074235916138, 0.773433268070221, 0.7599347233772278, 0.7259107232093811, 0.8603351712226868, 0.8742750287055969, 0.8975664377212524, 0.8300459384918213, 0.6050850749015808, 0.623131275177002, 0.9327719807624817, 0.8949155211448669, 0.8169150352478027, 0.9162038564682007, 0.9229300618171692, 0.9413315653800964, 0.9249693751335144, 0.8807979226112366, 0.9133352637290955, 0.7876614928245544, 0.8723695874214172, 0.884052574634552, 0.8139442801475525, 0.9301894307136536, 0.9240716099739075, 0.905803918838501, 0.7679833769798279, 0.9239380955696106, 0.8115646243095398, 0.9400618076324463, 0.8358347415924072, 0.8724891543388367, 0.7913109064102173, 0.9035669565200806, 0.853542685508728, 0.686076283454895, 0.7990504503250122, 0.717644989490509, 0.945283830165863, 0.5079808831214905, 0.9373188614845276, 0.8922610878944397, 0.8911042809486389, 0.8968897461891174, 0.8585601449012756, 0.9034266471862793, 0.918475329875946, 0.8975022435188293, 0.8575669527053833, 0.8995437622070312, 0.551156222820282, 0.8680396676063538, 0.8425315022468567, 0.8836899399757385, 0.8773261308670044, 0.6946797966957092, 0.6533230543136597, 0.8315339684486389, 0.8776172995567322, 0.7464765906333923, 0.8876344561576843, 0.894504964351654, 0.8572167754173279, 0.8646039366722107, 0.8620033860206604, 0.781620442867279, 0.6451101899147034, 0.7937595248222351, 0.7832372188568115, 0.8579474091529846, 0.8916729092597961, 0.9351063966751099, 0.9042297005653381, 0.9315035939216614, 0.7238070368766785, 0.9399794936180115, 0.8985409736633301, 0.8529109954833984, 0.9193222522735596, 0.6544211506843567, 0.8951922059059143, 0.6116191744804382, 0.6369091272354126, 0.871394157409668, 0.8646960854530334, 0.8946451544761658, 0.7579469084739685, 0.8504922986030579, 0.8942039012908936, 0.904126763343811, 0.9147695899009705, 0.8776351809501648, 0.8856595158576965, 0.9523002505302429, 0.7287004590034485, 0.9304943084716797, 0.9144026637077332, 0.9005230069160461, 0.8274688124656677, 0.7543375492095947, 0.8472542762756348, 0.6647149920463562, 0.5592595338821411, 0.6909069418907166, 0.8737752437591553, 0.6966622471809387, 0.8591030836105347, 0.9162464141845703, 0.7788375616073608, 0.9212164878845215, 0.8062251806259155, 0.8790493011474609, 0.6419706344604492, 0.8869277834892273, 0.9532151222229004, 0.8968027234077454, 0.9113248586654663, 0.915758490562439, 0.8760833144187927, 0.9385428428649902, 0.7953060865402222, 0.8770771026611328, 0.9011725187301636, 0.9166610240936279, 0.6351987719535828, 0.9050248265266418, 0.8231573700904846, 0.8204818964004517, 0.6920587420463562, 0.8021603226661682, 0.761898934841156, 0.7508637309074402, 0.7169363498687744, 0.615703284740448, 0.8946542143821716, 0.7823947072029114, 0.9432530999183655, 0.9194082617759705, 0.813549816608429, 0.848717987537384, 0.9183557629585266, 0.8589410185813904, 0.7212203741073608, 0.810435950756073, 0.8092624545097351, 0.8385741710662842, 0.8560876250267029, 0.6211197376251221, 0.8597916960716248, 0.9098460674285889, 0.9274464249610901, 0.9260234236717224, 0.9256151914596558, 0.8607598543167114, 0.9549465775489807, 0.9233964085578918, 0.9176998734474182, 0.6363890767097473, 0.952080249786377, 0.6794021725654602, 0.9059364199638367, 0.9088208675384521, 0.882007360458374, 0.9040400981903076, 0.6569104790687561, 0.6932747960090637, 0.9446336627006531, 0.9252804517745972, 0.853747546672821, 0.7212467789649963, 0.9070125222206116, 0.663635790348053, 0.7425088286399841, 0.851002037525177, 0.9240691065788269, 0.7846693992614746, 0.736868679523468, 0.7898826003074646, 0.9234479069709778, 0.9100187420845032, 0.8947489261627197, 0.9178686738014221, 0.8771871328353882, 0.8956798911094666, 0.8372395634651184, 0.5269873142242432, 0.5094601511955261, 0.6241521835327148, 0.9006437659263611, 0.9127922058105469, 0.9494115710258484, 0.7497571110725403, 0.793235182762146, 0.5882055759429932, 0.546864926815033, 0.6058787703514099, 0.763814389705658, 0.8795890212059021, 0.8467166423797607, 0.9026651382446289, 0.843674898147583, 0.9223254919052124, 0.9142355918884277, 0.9159429669380188, 0.8789060711860657, 0.8551207184791565, 0.840904176235199, 0.8604088425636292, 0.9139959812164307, 0.9239612817764282, 0.7463460564613342, 0.907643735408783, 0.6449630856513977, 0.924608588218689, 0.7144548296928406, 0.8643988966941833, 0.8481391072273254, 0.7896868586540222, 0.9153689742088318, 0.7881582379341125, 0.8819606900215149, 0.9312140941619873, 0.7148578763008118, 0.7056317925453186, 0.9018205404281616, 0.8720214366912842, 0.7164048552513123, 0.9153420329093933, 0.6206561923027039, 0.7899782061576843, 0.8546960949897766, 0.7481313347816467, 0.4372289180755615, 0.87115079164505, 0.7978915572166443, 0.8585857152938843, 0.9119500517845154, 0.886328399181366, 0.8807976245880127, 0.9277709722518921, 0.8763948082923889, 0.9008356928825378, 0.8394848704338074, 0.843526303768158, 0.9256278872489929, 0.9131752848625183, 0.8864342570304871, 0.8859290480613708, 0.5810763835906982, 0.716671884059906, 0.8935131430625916, 0.7606586813926697, 0.9131078124046326, 0.8961209058761597, 0.9236252307891846, 0.829682469367981, 0.8746320009231567, 0.9117369055747986, 0.7009175419807434, 0.9446085095405579, 0.8968413472175598, 0.9293884634971619, 0.9482784867286682, 0.9221938252449036, 0.8191187977790833, 0.7187490463256836, 0.8946012854576111, 0.796631932258606, 0.838320791721344, 0.8623530268669128, 0.8551493883132935, 0.7163224816322327, 0.8237423300743103, 0.8477316498756409, 0.9067214131355286, 0.8714972734451294, 0.953196108341217, 0.8741715550422668, 0.9525697827339172, 0.8806458115577698, 0.8019208312034607, 0.7911595106124878, 0.7583289742469788, 0.8986253142356873, 0.8750595450401306, 0.9367681741714478, 0.8285240530967712, 0.8901280760765076, 0.7917163968086243, 0.8767395615577698, 0.8910158276557922, 0.8416376709938049, 0.5951535105705261, 0.8740050196647644, 0.8190687298774719, 0.8412318825721741, 0.8739045262336731, 0.6588665843009949, 0.8415173888206482, 0.882274329662323, 0.9080982208251953, 0.8848223090171814, 0.9052965044975281, 0.8829418420791626, 0.6000675559043884, 0.8169605731964111, 0.9257755279541016, 0.7927976846694946, 0.8766639828681946, 0.5095666646957397, 0.9278342127799988, 0.8677345514297485, 0.9123547077178955, 0.705939769744873, 0.9002186059951782, 0.9271959662437439, 0.8822765946388245, 0.7780517339706421, 0.9463046193122864, 0.5425742268562317, 0.8644668459892273, 0.925278902053833, 0.8937137126922607, 0.5370669364929199, 0.6189804673194885, 0.8348531126976013, 0.8491514325141907, 0.9006679654121399, 0.8909761309623718, 0.7123838067054749, 0.661097526550293, 0.8683562874794006, 0.8404343724250793, 0.7044467329978943, 0.7840959429740906, 0.8867692351341248, 0.9008248448371887, 0.8846753239631653, 0.8852991461753845, 0.8955315947532654, 0.9087416529655457, 0.90768963098526, 0.920712411403656, 0.9213799834251404, 0.9235097765922546, 0.7343830466270447, 0.6890891194343567, 0.8670628666877747, 0.8889649510383606, 0.79295814037323, 0.9417949914932251, 0.9058198928833008, 0.8698211312294006, 0.7698608636856079, 0.9143056273460388, 0.9100939631462097, 0.9190536141395569, 0.9270699620246887, 0.8189975619316101, 0.8790081143379211, 0.9236703515052795, 0.9195041060447693, 0.762078583240509, 0.8924291729927063, 0.8447348475456238, 0.7866420745849609, 0.875164806842804, 0.6716983914375305, 0.8112355470657349, 0.7987298965454102, 0.9045808911323547, 0.7901210188865662, 0.8942374587059021, 0.892740786075592, 0.87477046251297, 0.8974191546440125, 0.9318720698356628, 0.8133783936500549, 0.9579740762710571, 0.9123204350471497, 0.9194740653038025, 0.9229549765586853, 0.8770992159843445, 0.8940581679344177, 0.888079047203064, 0.9031074643135071, 0.8293359875679016, 0.8969640135765076, 0.9173182845115662, 0.6849548816680908, 0.9063902497291565, 0.7861178517341614, 0.8226485252380371, 0.5532118678092957, 0.9464313387870789, 0.9501181840896606, 0.9148602485656738, 0.8071035146713257, 0.882824718952179, 0.8856938481330872, 0.938286542892456, 0.8942492008209229, 0.951626181602478, 0.9031062722206116, 0.9126104712486267, 0.8310790657997131, 0.8773232102394104, 0.9230424165725708, 0.8692554831504822, 0.5429863333702087, 0.913046658039093, 0.9175812005996704, 0.875777542591095, 0.795942485332489, 0.8543516397476196, 0.8442211747169495, 0.9403135180473328, 0.8749799132347107, 0.8506237864494324, 0.7301633358001709, 0.7225283980369568, 0.8492079377174377, 0.9230483174324036, 0.9222590327262878, 0.8586772084236145, 0.9531802535057068, 0.9080347418785095, 0.7178053855895996, 0.8299195766448975, 0.8307282328605652, 0.8941723704338074, 0.8878539800643921, 0.9166882634162903, 0.767547070980072, 0.7945091128349304, 0.9670177102088928, 0.6710379719734192, 0.9254292845726013, 0.9306731224060059, 0.9029825329780579, 0.8899014592170715, 0.8878923654556274, 0.8913003206253052, 0.8753789067268372, 0.8901863694190979, 0.8877691030502319, 0.8652759790420532, 0.8878390192985535, 0.7872405648231506, 0.9092521071434021, 0.6152054667472839, 0.9259491562843323, 0.8039452433586121, 0.9122276902198792, 0.8412135243415833, 0.782417356967926, 0.9037486910820007, 0.5774416327476501, 0.8846909999847412, 0.8895121812820435, 0.91511470079422, 0.8276341557502747, 0.905925452709198, 0.906701385974884, 0.854656994342804, 0.7678133249282837, 0.779310941696167, 0.7247099280357361, 0.9153409600257874, 0.8712527751922607, 0.9231380820274353, 0.9520745277404785, 0.8022357821464539, 0.9398014545440674, 0.8095563054084778, 0.9300639033317566, 0.7906591892242432, 0.8645995855331421, 0.8964254260063171, 0.9316146969795227, 0.47594153881073, 0.8963606953620911, 0.6528602242469788, 0.8674241304397583, 0.7771074175834656, 0.8668305277824402, 0.9359963536262512, 0.8558740615844727, 0.8920486569404602, 0.7732892036437988, 0.8987821340560913, 0.853237509727478, 0.5512484312057495, 0.88638836145401, 0.8997499346733093, 0.87762451171875, 0.8970121741294861, 0.814431369304657, 0.6871764063835144, 0.9256808161735535, 0.8898691534996033, 0.8436692953109741, 0.8327970504760742, 0.8763969540596008, 0.9196068644523621, 0.8933432698249817, 0.8935228586196899, 0.6286985278129578, 0.8742706775665283, 0.943941056728363, 0.9289347529411316, 0.9152128100395203, 0.9222239851951599, 0.8526156544685364, 0.806710958480835, 0.8104432821273804, 0.9104340672492981, 0.825597882270813, 0.7874224185943604, 0.8521338701248169, 0.8392952084541321, 0.925983726978302, 0.9234529137611389, 0.759236216545105, 0.7276279926300049, 0.8822734951972961, 0.8543140292167664, 0.7961135506629944, 0.9254750609397888, 0.923309862613678, 0.9723959565162659, 0.9111047387123108, 0.7935397028923035, 0.7961472868919373, 0.8683748245239258, 0.6831225752830505, 0.8808506727218628, 0.831462025642395, 0.8735325336456299, 0.8035874962806702, 0.8999307751655579, 0.880992591381073, 0.5566875338554382, 0.9413359761238098, 0.8757770657539368, 0.8939992785453796, 0.6791848540306091, 0.8776604533195496, 0.9142521023750305, 0.897375762462616, 0.3435766398906708, 0.8913272023200989, 0.878765881061554, 0.8863286972045898, 0.9125458598136902, 0.8580672144889832, 0.6556591987609863, 0.9824085831642151, 0.8062950968742371, 0.8833739757537842, 0.736122190952301, 0.9045616984367371, 0.8066531419754028, 0.9206768870353699, 0.9258050322532654, 0.8797716498374939, 0.8520963191986084, 0.9095149636268616, 0.9285112023353577, 0.6602174043655396, 0.9002833962440491, 0.945949137210846, 0.6477928757667542, 0.9240038394927979, 0.9282023906707764, 0.8948833346366882, 0.7854108214378357, 0.8770327568054199, 0.7462947964668274, 0.8609673380851746, 0.8636274933815002, 0.9468527436256409, 0.789393424987793, 0.8998647928237915, 0.9236816763877869, 0.9259229302406311, 0.9052397608757019, 0.8551846146583557, 0.8920993208885193, 0.9256209135055542, 0.8924789428710938, 0.7266138195991516, 0.7938708066940308, 0.9107208251953125, 0.7119107842445374, 0.8982248902320862, 0.8408528566360474, 0.9116543531417847, 0.8580422401428223, 0.7755856513977051, 0.8840607404708862, 0.874451756477356, 0.8188703060150146, 0.8110862374305725, 0.6324369311332703, 0.7500370740890503, 0.7852894067764282, 0.8108163475990295, 0.8509357571601868, 0.5948514342308044, 0.9071590304374695, 0.9137060642242432, 0.8944463729858398, 0.7449446320533752, 0.8263635635375977, 0.7442378401756287, 0.8695264458656311, 0.8648568391799927, 0.8952770233154297, 0.9268353581428528, 0.9368122220039368, 0.8734830021858215, 0.9000018835067749, 0.6039407849311829, 0.8858121037483215, 0.8767336010932922, 0.8480793833732605, 0.8561672568321228, 0.869208037853241, 0.7200180888175964, 0.8703243136405945, 0.9282680153846741, 0.8848361968994141, 0.9275549650192261, 0.9124022722244263, 0.7743568420410156, 0.8289595246315002, 0.8699475526809692, 0.8381546139717102, 0.9558562636375427, 0.823647141456604, 0.8911297917366028, 0.8592681288719177, 0.797347366809845, 0.8726259469985962, 0.8666913509368896, 0.9348506927490234, 0.9423597455024719, 0.8805435299873352, 0.7626836895942688, 0.8908879160881042, 0.8778021335601807, 0.9139227271080017, 0.5897022485733032, 0.6900653839111328, 0.8987906575202942, 0.8885520696640015, 0.9226793646812439, 0.9009554982185364, 0.9285281300544739, 0.9537906646728516, 0.67486172914505, 0.9303315877914429, 0.9071871638298035, 0.8877443075180054, 0.90055912733078, 0.8890408873558044, 0.8930089473724365, 0.8723642230033875, 0.8633309006690979, 0.7537665963172913, 0.895791232585907, 0.8791018128395081, 0.91079181432724, 0.8260373473167419, 0.8798853158950806, 0.8308718800544739, 0.8948472738265991, 0.8419453501701355, 0.8610156774520874, 0.9005885720252991, 0.913702130317688, 0.7149890065193176, 0.9010000824928284, 0.8793239593505859, 0.8657629489898682, 0.601054847240448, 0.9261114001274109, 0.8722265362739563, 0.9206872582435608, 0.7894904017448425, 0.8984848260879517, 0.8776286840438843, 0.7203908562660217, 0.7988829016685486, 0.4596925377845764, 0.8511362075805664, 0.8454447388648987, 0.9434090256690979, 0.9161547422409058, 0.9093440175056458, 0.9371504783630371, 0.961449921131134, 0.9100473523139954, 0.9100605249404907, 0.6682092547416687, 0.9096872210502625, 0.8796231746673584, 0.8799583911895752, 0.8728645443916321, 0.9087442755699158, 0.8226172924041748, 0.4311201572418213, 0.83146071434021, 0.8154009580612183, 0.9228132367134094, 0.918944239616394, 0.9121184349060059, 0.9145066142082214, 0.8654888272285461, 0.9635454416275024, 0.7624438405036926, 0.8934330344200134, 0.9116069674491882, 0.9110886454582214, 0.9379608631134033, 0.8315576910972595, 0.9052322506904602, 0.7871131896972656, 0.8326880931854248, 0.8044142127037048, 0.8510764241218567, 0.6583152413368225, 0.8103919625282288, 0.9202094674110413, 0.8723499774932861, 0.9284588694572449, 0.8972763419151306, 0.7614167928695679, 0.9357104301452637, 0.8186630010604858, 0.8646833300590515, 0.8964125514030457, 0.9189179539680481, 0.7907052636146545, 0.9251212477684021, 0.8968953490257263, 0.9486650228500366, 0.8591148257255554, 0.871074914932251, 0.7804687023162842, 0.8907893300056458, 0.8082632422447205, 0.8607058525085449, 0.9098625183105469, 0.9131893515586853, 0.9045302271842957, 0.951708197593689, 0.9013229012489319, 0.8926645517349243, 0.8057584166526794, 0.9207853674888611, 0.8742223381996155, 0.816299319267273, 0.8024761080741882, 0.932025134563446, 0.7584020495414734, 0.7271533012390137, 0.7819855809211731, 0.9306094646453857, 0.8797577023506165, 0.891262948513031, 0.9068814516067505]}